North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 1. Right to Appraisal and Payment for Shares.

§ 55-13-01.
Definitions.

In this Article, the following definitions apply:

Affiliate. — A person that directly, or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another person or is a senior executive thereof. For purposes of G.S. 55-13-01(7), a person is deemed to be an affiliate of its senior executives.

Beneficial shareholder. — A person who is the beneficial owner of shares held in a voting trust or by a nominee on the beneficial owner’s behalf.

Corporation. — The issuer of the shares held by a shareholder demanding appraisal and, for matters covered in

G.S. 55-13-22

through

G.S. 55-13-31

, the term includes the surviving entity in a merger.

Expenses. — Reasonable expenses of every kind that are incurred in connection with a matter, including counsel fees.

Fair value. — The value of the corporation’s shares (i) immediately before the effectuation of the corporate action as to which the shareholder asserts appraisal rights, excluding any appreciation or depreciation in anticipation of the corporate action unless exclusion would be inequitable, (ii) using customary and current valuation concepts and techniques generally employed for similar business in the context of the transaction requiring appraisal, and (iii) without discounting for lack of marketability or minority status except, if appropriate, for amendments to the articles pursuant to G.S. 55-13-02(a)(5).

Interest. — Interest from the effective date of the corporate action until the date of payment, at the rate of interest on judgments in this State on the effective date of the corporate action.

Interested transaction. — A corporate action described in

G.S. 55-13-02(a)

, other than a merger pursuant to

G.S. 55-11-04

or

G.S. 55-11-12

, involving an interested person and in which any of the shares or assets of the corporation are being acquired or converted. As used in this definition, the following definitions apply:

Interested person. — A person, or an affiliate of a person, who at any time during the one-year period immediately preceding approval by the board of directors of the corporate action met any of the following conditions:

Was the beneficial owner of twenty percent (20%) or more of the voting power of the corporation, other than as owner of excluded shares.

Had the power, contractually or otherwise, other than as owner of excluded shares, to cause the appointment or election of twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the directors to the board of directors of the corporation.

Was a senior executive or director of the corporation or a senior executive of any affiliate thereof, and that senior executive or director will receive, as a result of the corporate action, a financial benefit not generally available to other shareholders as such, other than any of the following:

Employment, consulting, retirement, or similar benefits established separately and not as part of or in contemplation of the corporate action.

Employment, consulting, retirement, or similar benefits established in contemplation of, or as part of, the corporate action that are not more favorable than those existing before the corporate action or, if more favorable, that have been approved on behalf of the corporation in the same manner as is provided in G.S. 55-8-31(a)(1) and (c).

In the case of a director of the corporation who will, in the corporate action, become a director of the acquiring entity, or one of its affiliates, rights and benefits as a director that are provided on the same basis as those afforded by the acquiring entity generally to other directors of the acquiring entity or such affiliate of the acquiring entity.

Beneficial owner. — Any person who, directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, or understanding, other than a revocable proxy, has or shares the power to vote, or to direct the voting of, shares. If a member of a national securities exchange is precluded by the rules of the exchange from voting without instruction on contested matters or matters that may affect substantially the rights or privileges of the holders of the securities to be voted, then that member of a national securities exchange shall not be deemed a “beneficial owner” of any securities held directly or indirectly by the member on behalf of another person solely because the member is the record holder of the securities. When two or more persons agree to act together for the purpose of voting their shares of the corporation, each member of the group formed thereby is deemed to have acquired beneficial ownership, as of the date of the agreement, of all voting shares of the corporation beneficially owned by any member of the group.

Excluded shares. — Shares acquired pursuant to an offer for all shares having voting power if the offer was made within one year prior to the corporate action for consideration of the same kind and of a value equal to or less than that paid in connection with the corporate action.

Preferred shares. — A class or series of shares the holders of which have preference over any other class or series with respect to distributions.

Record shareholder. — The person in whose name shares are registered in the records of the corporation or the beneficial owner of shares to the extent of the rights granted by a nominee certificate on file with the corporation.

Senior executive. — The chief executive officer, chief operating officer, chief financial officer, or anyone in charge of a principal business unit or function.

Shareholder. — Both a record shareholder and a beneficial shareholder.

History.

1925, c. 77, s. 1; 1943, c. 270; G.S., s. 55-167; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1969, c. 751, s. 39; 1973, c. 469, ss. 36, 37; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2011-347, s. 1; 2018-45, s. 24.

OFFICIAL COMMENT TO THE 2002 MODEL BUSINESS CORPORATION ACT

Overview

Definitions

Chapter 13 deals with the tension between the desire of the corporate leadership to be able to enter new fields, acquire new enterprises, and rearrange investor rights, and the desire of investors to adhere to the rights and the risks on the basis of which they invested. Contemporary corporation statutes in the United States attempt to resolve this tension through a combination of two devices. On the one hand, through their approval of an amendment to the articles of incorporation, a merger, share exchange or disposition of assets, the majority may change the nature and shape of the enterprise and the rights of all its shareholders. On the other hand, shareholders who object to these changes may withdraw the fair value of their investment in cash through their exercise of appraisal rights.

The traditional accommodation has been sharply criticized from two directions. From the viewpoint of investors who object to the transaction, the appraisal process is criticized for providing little help to the ordinary investor because its technicalities make its use difficult, expensive, and risky. From the viewpoint of the corporate leadership, the appraisal process is criticized because it fails to protect the corporation from demands that are motivated by the hope of a nuisance settlement or by fanciful conceptions of value. See generally Bayless Manning, “The Shareholders’ Appraisal Remedy: An Essay for Frank Coker,” 72 Yale L.J. 223 (1962).

Chapter 13 is a compromise between these opposing points of view. It is designed to increase the frequency with which assertion of appraisal rights leads to economical and satisfying solutions, and to decrease the frequency with which such assertion leads to delay, expense, and dissatisfaction. It seeks to achieve these goals primarily by simplifying and clarifying the appraisal process, as well as by motivating the parties to settle their differences in private negotiations without resort to judicial appraisal proceedings.

Chapter 13 proceeds from the premise that judicial appraisal should be provided by statute only when two conditions co-exist. First, the proposed corporate action as approved by the majority will result in a fundamental change in the shares to be affected by the action. Second, uncertainty concerning the fair value of the affected shares may cause reasonable persons to differ about the fairness of the terms of the corporate action. Uncertainty is greatly reduced, however, in the case of publicly-traded shares. This explains both the market exception described below and the limits provided to the exception.

Appraisal rights in connection with mergers and share exchanges under chapter 11 and dispositions of assets requiring shareholder approval under chapter 12 are provided when these two conditions co-exist. Each of these actions will result in a fundamental change in the shares that a disapproving shareholder may feel was not adequately compensated by the terms approved by the majority. Except for shareholders of a subsidiary corporation that is merged under section 11.05 (the “short-form” merger), only those shareholders who are entitled to vote on a transaction are entitled to appraisal rights. The linkage between voting and appraisal rights is justified because the right to a shareholder vote is a good proxy for assessing the seriousness of the change contemplated by the corporate action. This is especially true where the action triggers group-voting provisions.

Notwithstanding this linkage, amended chapter 13 eliminates appraisal for voting shareholders in several instances where it would have been available under the 1984 Act. Shareholders who are entitled to vote on a corporate action, whether because such shareholders have general voting rights or because group voting provisions are triggered, are not entitled to appraisal if the change will not alter the terms of the class or series of securities that they hold. Thus, statutory appraisal rights are not available for shares of any class of the surviving corporation in a merger or any class of shares that is not included in a share exchange. Appraisal is also not triggered by a voluntary dissolution under chapter 14 because that action does not affect liquidation rights — the only rights that are relevant following a shareholder vote to dissolve.

With the exception of reverse stock splits that result in cashing out some of the shares of a class or series, amended chapter 13 also eliminates appraisal in connection with all amendments to the articles of incorporation. This change in amended chapter 13 does not reflect a judgment that an amendment changing the terms of a particular class or series may not have significant economic effects. Rather, it reflects a judgment that distinguishing among different types of amendments for the purposes of statutory appraisal is necessarily arbitrary and thus may not accurately reflect the actual demand of shareholders for appraisal in specific instances. Instead, amended chapter 13 permits a high degree of private-ordering by delineating a list of transactions for which the corporation may voluntarily choose to provide appraisal and by permitting a provision in the articles of incorporation that eliminates, in whole or in part, statutory appraisal rights for preferred shares.

Chapter 13 also is unique in its approach to appraisal rights for publicly-traded shares. Approximately half of the general corporation statutes in the United States provide exceptions to appraisal for publicly-traded shares, on the theory that it is not productive to expose the corporation to the time, expense and cash drain imposed by appraisal demands when shareholders who are dissatisfied with the consideration offered in an appraisal-triggering transaction could sell their shares and obtain cash from the market. This exception to appraisal is generally known as the “market-out” and is referred to here as the “market exception.” Opponents of the market exception argue that it results in unfairness where neither the consideration offered in connection with the transaction nor the market price reflects the fair value of the shares, particularly if the corporate decision-makers have a conflict of interest.

Chapter 13 seeks to accommodate both views by providing a market exception that is limited to those situations where shareholders are likely to receive fair value when they sell their shares in the market after the announcement of an appraisal-triggering transaction. For the market exception to apply under chapter 13, there must first be a liquid market. Second, unique to chapter 13, the market exception does not apply in specified circumstances where the appraisal-triggering action is deemed to be a conflict-of-interest transaction.

Section 13.01 contains specialized definitions applicable only to chapter 13.

Beneficial shareholder

The definition of “beneficial shareholder” means a person who owns the beneficial interest in shares; “shares” is defined in section 1.40(22) to include, without limitation, a holder of a depository receipt for shares. Similar definitions are found in section 7.40(2) (derivative proceedings) and section 16.02(f) (inspection of records by a shareholder). In the context of chapter 13, beneficial shareholder means a person having a direct economic interest in the shares. The definition is not intended to adopt the broad definition of beneficial ownership in SEC Rule 13d-2, which includes persons with a right to vote or dispose of the shares even though they have no economic interest in them. However, section 13.02(b)(5) includes the concept of the right to vote in determining whether the event represents a conflict transaction that renders the market exception unavailable.

Corporation

The definition of “corporation”” in section 13.01(3) includes, for purposes of the post-transaction matters covered in section 13.22 through 13.31, a successor entity in a merger where the corporation is not the surviving entity. The definition does not include a domestic acquiring corporation in a share exchange or disposition of assets because the corporation whose shares or assets were acquired continues in existence in both of these instances and remains responsible for the appraisal obligations. Whether a foreign corporation or other form of domestic or foreign entity is subject to appraisal rights in connection with any of these transactions depends upon the corporation or other applicable law of the relevant jurisdiction.

Fair value

Subsection (i) of the definition of “fair value” in section 13.01(4) makes clear that fair value is to be determined immediately before the effectuation of the corporate action, rather than, as is the case under most state statutes that address the issue, the date of the shareholders’ vote. This comports with the purpose of this chapter to preserve the shareholder’s prior rights as a shareholder until the effective date of the corporate action, rather than leaving the shareholder in an ambiguous state with neither rights as a shareholder nor perfected appraisal rights. The corporation and, as relevant, its shares are valued as they exist immediately before the effectuation of the corporate action requiring appraisal. Accordingly, section 13.01(4) permits consideration of changes in the market price of the corporation’s shares in anticipation of the transaction, to the extent such changes are relevant. Similarly, in a two-step transaction culminating in a merger, the corporation is valued immediately before the second step merger, taking into account any interim changes in value.
Cf. Cede & Co. v. Technicolor, Inc.
, 684 A.2d 289 (Del. 1996).

The definition of “fair value” in section 13.01(4) makes several changes from the prior version. The 1984 Model Act’s definition of “fair value” was silent on how fair value was to be determined, except for a concluding clause that excluded from the valuation “any appreciation or depreciation in anticipation of the corporate action, unless exclusion would be inequitable.” The Official Comment provided that the section left to the courts “the details by which ‘fair value’ is to be determined within the broad outlines of the definition.” While the logic of the prior Official Comment continues to apply, the exclusionary clause in the prior Model Act definition, including the qualification for cases where the exclusion would be inequitable, has been deleted. Those provisions have not been susceptible to meaningful judicial interpretation and have been set aside in favor of the broader concept in subsection (ii).

The new formulation in paragraph (ii), which is patterned on section 7.22 of the Principles of Corporate Governance promulgated by the American Law Institute, directs courts to keep the methodology chosen in appraisal proceedings consistent with evolving economic concepts and adopts that part of section 7.22 which provides that fair value should be determined using “customary valuation concepts and techniques generally employed .
. . for similar businesses in the context of the transaction requiring appraisal.” Subsection (ii) adopts the accepted view that different transactions and different contexts may warrant different valuation methodologies. Customary valuation concepts and techniques will typically take into account numerous relevant factors, including assigning a higher valuation to corporate assets that would be more productive if acquired in a comparable transaction but excluding any element of value attributable to the unique synergies of the actual purchaser of the corporation or its assets. For example, if the corporation’s assets include undeveloped real estate that is located in a prime commercial area, the court should consider the value that would be attributed to the real estate as commercial development property in a comparable transaction. The court should not, however, assign any additional value based upon the specific plans or special use of the actual purchaser.

Modern valuation methods will normally result in a range of values, not a particular single value. When a transaction falls within that range, “fair value” has been established. Absent unusual circumstances, it is expected that the consideration in an arm’s-length transaction will fall within the range of “fair value” for purposes of section 13.01(4). Section 7.22 of the ALI Principles of Corporate Governance also provides that in situations that do not involve certain types of
specified conflicts of interest, “the aggregate price accepted by the board of directors of the subject corporation should be presumed to represent the fair value of the corporation, or of the assets sold in the case of an asset sale, unless the plaintiff can prove otherwise by clear and convincing evidence.” That presumption has not been included in the definition of “fair value” in section 13.01(4) because the framework of defined types of conflict transactions which is a predicate for the ALI”s presumption is not contained in the Model Act. Nonetheless, under section 13.01(4), a court determining fair value should give great deference to the aggregate consideration accepted or approved by a disinterested board of directors for an appraisal-triggering transaction.

Subsection (iii) of the definition of “fair value” establishes that valuation discounts for lack of marketability or minority status are inappropriate in most appraisal actions, both because most transactions that trigger appraisal rights affect the corporation as a whole and because such discounts give the majority the opportunity to take advantage of minority shareholders who have been forced against their will to accept the appraisal-triggering transaction. Subsection (iii), in conjunction with the lead-in language to the definition, is also designed to adopt the more modern view that appraisal should generally award a shareholder his or her proportional interest in the corporation after valuing the corporation as a whole, rather than the value of the shareholder’s shares when valued alone. If, however, the corporation voluntarily grants appraisal rights for transactions that do not affect the entire corporation — such as certain amendments to the articles of incorporation — the court should use its discretion in applying discounts if appropriate. As the introductory clause of section 13.01 notes, the definition of “fair value” applies only to chapter 13. See the Official Comment to section 14.34 which recognizes that a minority discount may be appropriate under that section.

Interest

The definition of “interest” in section 13.01(5) is included to apprise the parties of their respective rights and obligations. The right to receive interest is based on the elementary consideration that the corporation, rather than the shareholder demanding appraisal, has the use of the shareholder’s money from the effective date of the corporate action (when those shareholders who do not demand appraisal rights have the right to receive their consideration from the transaction) until the date of payment. Section 13.01(5) thus requires interest to be paid at the rate of interest on judgments from the effective date of the corporate action until the date of payment. The specification of the rate of interest on judgments, rather than a more subjective rate, eliminates a possible issue of contention and should facilitate voluntary settlements. Each state determines whether interest is compound or simple.

Senior executive

The definition of “senior executive” in section 13.01(8) encompasses the group of individuals in control of corporate information and the day-to-day operations. An employee of a subsidiary organization is a “senior executive” of the parent if the employee is “in charge of a principal business unit or function” of the parent and its subsidiaries on a combined or consolidated basis.

Shareholder

The definition of “shareholder” in section 13.01(9) for purposes of chapter 13 differs from the definition of that term used elsewhere in the Model Act. Section 1.40(21) defines “shareholder” as used generally in the Act to mean only a “record shareholder”; that term is specifically defined in section 13.01(7). Section 13.01(9), on the other hand, defines “shareholder” to include not only a “record shareholder” but also a “beneficial shareholder,” a term that is itself defined in section 13.01(2). The specially defined terms “record shareholder” and “beneficial shareholder” appear primarily in section 13.03, which establishes the manner in which beneficial shareholders, and record shareholders who are acting on behalf of beneficial shareholders, perfect appraisal rights. The word “shareholder” is used generally throughout chapter 13 in order to permit both record and beneficial shareholders to take advantage of the provisions of this chapter, subject to their fulfilling the applicable requirements of this chapter.

North Carolina Commentary

The reference in the definition of “fair value” (in subdivision (3)) to “the effectuation of the corporate action” means the actual merger or other transaction that will occur after the shareholders vote on the transaction.

Subdivision 13.01(4) of the Model Act fixes the interest on fair value at the average rate currently paid by the corporation on its principal bank loans or, if none, at a rate that is fair and equitable under all the circumstances. This section differs from that provision in fixing the statutory “legal rate” as a floor and allows the court more flexibility in fixing a fair interest rate by providing that it should be fair and equitable under the circumstances and that the rate currently paid by the corporation on its principal bank loans, if any, is just one of those circumstances.